Illinois, session 104th, HB4004.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 109-2 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/109-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 109-2)7    Sec. 109-2. Person arrested in another county. 8    (a) Any person arrested in a county other than the one in 9which a warrant for his arrest was issued shall be taken 10without unnecessary delay before the nearest and most 11accessible judge in the county where the arrest was made or, if 12no additional delay is created, before the nearest and most 13accessible judge in the county from which the warrant was 14issued. The judge may hold a hearing to determine if the 15defendant is the same person as named in the warrant.16    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), any 17person arrested in a county other than the one in which a 18warrant for his arrest was issued, may waive the right to be 19taken before a judge in the county where the arrest was made. 20If a person so arrested waives such right, the arresting 21agency shall surrender such person to a law enforcement agency 22of the county that issued the warrant without unnecessary 23delay. The provisions of Section 109-1 shall then apply to the   HB4004- 2 -LRB104 12425 RLC 22719 b1person so arrested.2    (c) If a person is taken before a judge in any county and a 3warrant for arrest issued by another Illinois county exists 4for that person, the court in the arresting county shall hold 5for that person a detention hearing under Section 110-6.1, or 6other hearing under Section 110-5 or Section 110-6. 7    (d) After the court in the arresting county has determined 8whether the person shall be released or detained on the 9arresting offense, the court shall then order the sheriff to 10immediately contact the sheriff in any county where any 11warrant is outstanding and notify them of the arrest of the 12individual. 13    (e) If a person has a warrant in another county for an 14offense, then, no later than 5 calendar days after the end of 15any detention issued on the charge in the arresting county, 16the county where the warrant is issued outstanding shall 17arrange for the transport of the person to the county where the 18warrant was issued for a hearing under Section 110-6 or 19110-6.1 in the matter for which the warrant was issued. do one 20of the following: 21        (1) transport the person to the county where the 22    warrant was issued for a hearing under Section 110-6 or 23    110-6.1 in the matter for which the warrant was issued; or24    The arresting county shall (2) quash the warrant and order 25the person released on the case for which the warrant was 26issued only when the county that issued the warrant fails to   HB4004- 3 -LRB104 12425 RLC 22719 b1transport the defendant in the timeline as proscribed in this 2subsection (e). 3    The arresting county is not required to transport the 4person to the county that issued the warrant. 5    (f) If the issuing county fails to take any action under 6subsection (e) within 5 calendar days, the defendant shall be 7released from custody on the warrant, and the circuit judge or 8associate circuit judge in the county of arrest shall set 9conditions of release under Section 110-5 and shall admit the 10defendant to pretrial release for his or her appearance before 11the court named in the warrant. Upon releasing the defendant, 12the circuit judge or associate circuit judge shall certify 13such a fact on the warrant and deliver the warrant and the 14acknowledgment by the defendant of his or her receiving the 15conditions of pretrial release to the officer having charge of 16the defendant from arrest and without delay deliver such 17warrant and such acknowledgment by the defendant of his or her 18receiving the conditions to the court before which the 19defendant is required to appear. 20    (g) If a person has a warrant in another county, in lieu of 21transporting the person to the issuing county as outlined in 22subsection (e), the issuing county may hold the hearing by way 23of a two-way audio-visual communication system if the accused 24waives the right to be physically present in court, the court 25determines that the physical health and safety of any person 26necessary to the proceedings would be endangered by appearing   HB4004- 4 -LRB104 12425 RLC 22719 b1in court, or the chief judge of the circuit orders use of that 2system due to operational challenges in conducting the hearing 3in person. Such operational challenges must be documented and 4approved by the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to 5address the challenges through reasonable efforts must be 6presented and approved by the Administrative Office of the 7Illinois Courts every 6 months. 8    (h) If more than 2 Illinois county warrants exist, the 9judge in the county of arrest shall order that the process 10described in subsections (d) through (f) occur in each county 11in whatever order the judge finds most appropriate. Each judge 12in each subsequent county shall then follow the rules in this 13Section. 14    (i) This Section applies only to warrants issued by 15Illinois state, county, or municipal courts. 16    (j) When an issuing agency is contacted by an out-of-state 17agency of a person arrested for any offense, or when an 18arresting agency is contacted by or contacts an out-of-state 19issuing agency, the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act shall 20govern. 21(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.)